Washington statutes.
RCW 35.55.100

Interest on assessments.

The local assessments shall bear interest at such rate as may be fixed by the council after the expiration of thirty days after the equalization of the assessment roll and shall bear such interest after delinquency as may be provided by general ordinance of the city.

[ 1981 c 156 s 3; 1965 c 7 s 35.55.100. Prior: 1909 c 147 s 12, part; RRS s 9443, part.]